Utah statutes.
31A-6a-107.   Cancellation of reimbursement insurance.

The issuer of a reimbursement insurance policy may not cancel the policy until a notice of cancellation in accordance with Section 31A-21-303, 31A-21-304, or 31A-21-305 has been mailed or delivered to the commissioner and to each insured provider.  The cancellation of a reimbursement policy may not reduce the issuer's responsibility for service contracts issued by providers prior to the date of the cancellation.

